Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 10
SURVEY OF RETURNS

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980, and this article was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 1992. For a detailed comparison of this article for 1980 and 1992, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 SURVEY OF RETURNS - PARTISAN ELECTIONS

PART 2 SURVEY OF RETURNS - NONPARTISAN ELECTIONS

PART 3 RECOUNTS